Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1112
Minimal sedation, defined.

Minimal sedation means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which (1) a patient retains the ability to independently and continuously maintain an airway and respond normally to tactile stimulation and verbal command, (2) cognitive function and coordination may be modestly impaired, and (3) ventilatory and cardiovascular functions are unaffected.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 445;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 5.